Utah statutes.
59-2-1207.   Claim applied against tax liability -- One claimant per
household per year.
(1) A county shall apply as provided in Subsection 59-2-1206(1)(c) the amount
of a credit under this part against:
(a)  a claimant's property tax liability; or
(b) the property tax liability of a spouse who was a member of the claimant's
household in the year in which the claimant applies for a homeowner's credit
under this part.
(2)  Only one claimant per household per year is entitled to payment under
this part.
